Missouri, session 2026, HB1721.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 27 and 56, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 27.120 and 56.910, to read as follows:
27.120. The attorney general shall compile a statewide report summarizing the
information provided by each prosecuting and circuit attorney under section 56.910 in a
uniform fashion and sortable by offense and jurisdiction, make the report available to
the public, and submit the report to the governor; the speaker of the house of
representatives, who shall distribute the report to the chair of the committee on crime
prevention and public safety of the house of representatives or any successor committee;
and the president pro tempore of the senate, who shall distribute the report to the chair
of the committee on judiciary and civil and criminal jurisprudence or any successor
committee. Each prosecuting and circuit attorney shall, to assist the attorney general in
compiling a uniform report, comply with any requests by the attorney general to
provide additional, disaggregated, or clarifying information.
56.910. Each prosecuting and circuit attorney's office shall share an annual
report by the first of March of each year with the governor and the attorney general.
Such report shall be made available to the public upon request. Each report shall
contain, at a minimum, for the previous year, all aggregate, nonpersonally identifying
data in each category of offense regarding the handling of cases by the office including:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1721 2
(1) Intake processes, including the number of arrests or referrals made for each
category of offense and:
(a) The number accepted for prosecution;
(b) The number referred to a diversion program before charging; and
(c) The number dismissed with a categorical description of why the case was so
dismissed;
(2) Disposals for each category of offense, including the number of cases:
(a) Disposed of by a diversion program;
(b) Adjudicated guilty by a plea agreement, or dismissed due to a guilty plea to a
different charge;
(c) Dismissed for prosecution by another authority;
(d) Dismissed due to suppression of evidence;
(e) Dismissed due to other legal defect;
(f) Dismissed due to refusal of one or more witnesses to cooperate;
(g) Dismissed for any other reason;
(h) Adjudicated by trial to the court, with the number of people who were
convicted;
(i) Adjudicated by jury trial, with the number of people who were convicted; and
(3) Disposition for each category of offense, including the number of people:
(a) Sentenced to incarceration;
(b) Sentenced to a county jail, with the average length of such sentence;
(c) Sentenced to a state correctional center, with the average length of such
sentence; and
(d) Sentenced to probation.
✔